Connecticut, session 2026, SB00329.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 17b-261 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Medical assistance shall be provided for any otherwise eligible
person (1) whose income, including any available support from legally
liable relatives and the income of the person's spouse or dependent
child, is not more than one hundred fifty-nine per cent, pending
approval of a federal waiver applied for pursuant to subsection (e) of
this section, of the benefit amount paid to a person with no income
under the temporary family assistance program, and (2) if such person
is an institutionalized individual as defined in Section 1917 of the Social
Security Act, 42 USC 1396p(h)(3), and has not made an assignment or
transfer or other disposition of property for less than fair market value
for the purpose of establishing eligibility for benefits or assistance under
SB329 / File No. 293 1

SB329 File No. 293
this section. Any such disposition shall be treated in accordance with
Section 1917(c) of the Social Security Act, 42 USC 1396p(c). Any
disposition of property made on behalf of an applicant or recipient or
the spouse of an applicant or recipient by a guardian, conservator,
person authorized to make such disposition pursuant to a power of
attorney or other person so authorized by law shall be attributed to such
applicant, recipient or spouse. A disposition of property ordered by a
court shall be evaluated in accordance with the standards applied to any
other such disposition for the purpose of determining eligibility. The
commissioner shall establish the standards for eligibility for medical
assistance at one hundred fifty-nine per cent of the benefit amount paid
to a household of equal size with no income under the temporary family
assistance program. In determining eligibility, the commissioner shall
not consider as income United States Department of Veterans Affairs-
administered Aid and Attendance pension benefits that are granted to a
veteran, as defined in section 27-103, or the surviving spouse of such
veteran, or, on and after July 1, 2026, benefits received under Title II of
the Social Security Act by a disabled adult child who meets the criteria
set forth in 42 USC 402(d)(1)(G). Except as provided in section 17b-277
and section 17b-292, the medical assistance program shall provide
coverage to persons under the age of nineteen with household income
up to one hundred ninety-six per cent of the federal poverty level
without an asset limit and to persons under the age of nineteen, who
qualify for coverage under Section 1931 of the Social Security Act, with
household income not exceeding one hundred ninety-six per cent of the
federal poverty level without an asset limit, and their parents and needy
caretaker relatives, who qualify for coverage under Section 1931 of the
Social Security Act, with household income not exceeding one hundred
thirty-three per cent of the federal poverty level without an asset limit.
Such levels shall be based on the regional differences in such benefit
amount, if applicable, unless such levels based on regional differences
are not in conformance with federal law. Any income in excess of the
applicable amounts shall be applied as may be required by said federal
law, and assistance shall be granted for the balance of the cost of
authorized medical assistance. The Commissioner of Social Services
SB329 / File No. 293 2

SB329 File No. 293
shall provide applicants for assistance under this section, at the time of
application, with a written statement advising them of (A) the effect of
an assignment or transfer or other disposition of property on eligibility
for benefits or assistance, (B) the effect that having income that exceeds
the limits prescribed in this subsection will have with respect to
program eligibility, and (C) the availability of, and eligibility for,
services provided by the Connecticut Home Visiting System,
established pursuant to section 17b-751b. For coverage dates on or after
January 1, 2014, the department shall use the modified adjusted gross
income financial eligibility rules set forth in Section 1902(e)(14) of the
Social Security Act and the implementing regulations to determine
eligibility for HUSKY A, HUSKY B and HUSKY D applicants, as defined
in section 17b-290. To the extent permissible under federal law, the
Commissioner of Social Services shall disregard all United States
Department of Veterans Affairs-administered non-service-connected
pension benefits, Aid and Attendance pension benefits and
Housebound pension benefits that are granted to a veteran or the
surviving spouse of such veteran when determining income eligibility
for HUSKY A and HUSKY D applicants. Persons who are determined
ineligible for assistance pursuant to this section shall be provided a
written statement notifying such persons of their ineligibility and
advising such persons of their potential eligibility for one of the other
insurance affordability programs as defined in 42 CFR 435.4.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-261(a)
HS Joint Favorable
SB329 / File No. 293 3

SB329 File No. 293
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost See Below See Below
Resources of the General Fund GF - Revenue 125,000 None
Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS)
associated with disregarding certain federal social security benefits
received by an adult disabled child for HUSKY C income eligibility
purposes. The state will experience costs to the extent this change (1)
makes an individual eligible sooner than they otherwise would be
(because a spend-down is no longer required), (2) maintains eligibility
for a client who would otherwise lose coverage upon receipt of such
benefits, or (3) results in new HUSKY C enrollees who would not
otherwise seek coverage.
DSS will also incur costs of approximately $250,000 related to system
modifications, resulting in a federal grants revenue gain of
approximately $125,000.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to HUSKY C eligibility and service
utilization.
SB329 / File No. 293 4

SB329 File No. 293
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 329
AN ACT EXPANDING MEDICAID ELIGIBILITY FOR OLDER ADULTS
WITH DISABILITIES.